Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.450

Electronic wills—Self-proving.

(1) An electronic will may be simultaneously executed, attested, and made self-proving if:

(a) The affidavits of the attesting witnesses are affixed to or logically associated with the electronic will; and

(b) The qualified custodian maintains custody of the electronic will at all times following execution by the testator and witnesses.

(2) The affidavits under subsection (1)(a) of this section must state such facts as the attesting witnesses would be required to testify to in court to prove such electronic will, and must be:

(a) Made before an officer authorized to administer oaths or, if fewer than two attesting witnesses are physically present in the same location as the testator at the time of signing under RCW 11.12.440(1)(b), before an officer authorized under RCW 42.45.280; and

(b) Evidenced by the officer's certificate under official seal affixed to or logically associated with the electronic will.

(3)(a) If made before an officer authorized to administer oaths, the acknowledgment and affidavits under subsection (1) of this section must be in substantially the following form:

I, ..... (name), the testator, and, being sworn, declare to the undersigned officer that I sign this instrument as my electronic will, I willingly sign it or willingly direct another individual to sign it for me, I execute it as my voluntary act for the purposes expressed in this instrument, and I am 18 years of age or older, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue influence.

..... (signature)

Testator

We, ..... (name) and ..... (name), witnesses, being sworn, declare to the undersigned officer that the testator signed this instrument as the testator's electronic will, that the testator willingly signed it or willingly directed another individual to sign for the testator, and that each of us, in the physical or electronic presence of the testator, signs this instrument as witness to the testator's signing, and to the best of our knowledge the testator is 18 years of age or older, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue influence.

..... (signature)

Witness

..... (signature)

Witness

Certificate of officer:

State of .....

County of .....

Subscribed, sworn to, and acknowledged before me by ..... (name), the testator, and subscribed and sworn to before me by ..... (name) and ..... (name), witnesses, this ..... day of ....., .....

(Seal) .....

(Signed)

.....

(Capacity of officer)

(b) If made pursuant to chapter 5.50 RCW, the acknowledgment and affidavits under subsection (1) of this section must be in substantially the following form:

I, ..... (name), the testator, declare under penalty of perjury under the law of Washington that the following is true and correct: That I sign this instrument as my electronic will, I willingly sign it or willingly direct another individual to sign it for me, I execute it as my voluntary act for the purposes expressed in this instrument, and I am 18 years of age or older, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue influence.

..... (signature)

Testator

We, ..... (name) and ..... (name), witnesses, declare under penalty of perjury under the law of Washington that the following is true and correct: That the testator signed this instrument as the testator's electronic will, that the testator willingly signed it or willingly directed another individual to sign for the testator, and that each of us, in the physical or electronic presence of the testator, signs this instrument as witness to the testator's signing, and to the best of our knowledge the testator is 18 years of age or older, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue influence.

..... (signature)

Witness

..... (signature)

Witness

(4) A signature physically or electronically affixed to an affidavit that is affixed to or logically associated with an electronic will under RCW 11.12.400 through 11.12.491 is deemed a signature of the electronic will under RCW 11.12.440(1).

[ 2021 c 140 s 1006.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 140 ss 1001-1016: See note following RCW 11.12.400.